District of Columbia statutes.
26-1326

Power to make bylaws; purposes thereof.

The directors or trustees shall have power to make such bylaws as they deem proper for the management or disposal of the stock and business affairs of such company, not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter, and prescribing the duties of officers and servants that may be employed, for the appointment of all officers, and for carrying on all kinds of business within the objects and purposes of such company.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1308, ch. 854, § 738

History

1981 Ed., § 26-426.
1973 Ed., § 26-326.

Prior Codifications